src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! # Basque propernoun morphology

LEXICON Propcases 

+Abs: # ; 
+Erg:%>k # ; ! -ek
+Dat:%>i # ; ! -ri

+Ine:%>n # ; ! -en
+All:%>ra # ; ! -a
+Ela:%>tik # ; !-dik
+LGen:%>ko # ; !-go

+PGen:%>ren # ; !-en
+Ins:%>z # ; !-ez, taz, etaz
+Soc:%>rekin # ; !-ekin
+Ben:%>rentzat # ; !-entzat
+Ben2:%>rengatik # ; !-engatik

LEXICON Np

+N+Prop: Propcases ;
